Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1212
Presence of firearm in motor vehicle; prima facie evidence.

The presence in a motor vehicle other than a public vehicle of any firearm or instrument referred to in section 28-1203, 28-1206, 28-1207, or 28-1212.03 shall be prima facie evidence that it is in the possession of and is carried by all persons occupying such motor vehicle at the time such firearm or instrument is found, except that this section shall not be applicable if such firearm or instrument is found upon the person of one of the occupants therein.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 244;

Laws 1991, LB 477, § 3.

Although "prima facie evidence" is found in this section, the content of a statute within the criminal code is not necessarily and always proper information for a jury. State v. Jasper, 237 Neb. 754, 467 N.W.2d 855 (1991).